Colorado statutes. TITLE 19 Children's Code
ARTICLE 6
SUPPORT PROCEEDINGS

Editor's note:
This title was repealed and reenacted in 1987. For historical information concerning the repeal and reenactment, see the editor's note following the title heading.

Section

19-6-101. Initiation of proceedings - support - repayment of birth-related debt.

Proceedings to compel parents, or other legally responsible persons, to support a child or children may be commenced by any person filing a verified petition in the court of the county where the child resides or is physically present, or in the county
where the obligor parent resides, or in any county where public assistance is or was being paid on behalf of the child.

Repealed.

A petition under this article may be filed at any time prior to the twenty-first birthday of the child.

Once the court has acquired jurisdiction, such jurisdiction shall be retained regardless of the child's place of residence or physical presence.

The minority of the petitioner or of the respondent shall in no way affect the validity of the proceedings.

Actions brought under this article shall be entitled, "The People of the State of Colorado in the Interest of .........., children, upon the Petition of .........., petitioner, and concerning .........., respondent."

A petition filed pursuant to this article shall contain the following advisements:

That a request for genetic tests shall not prejudice the requesting party in matters concerning allocation of parental responsibilities pursuant to section 14-10-124 (1.5), C.R.S.; and

That, if genetic tests are not obtained prior to a legal establishment of paternity and submitted into evidence prior to the entry of the final order establishing paternity, the genetic tests may not be allowed into evidence at a later date.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 811, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 89:
(1) and (2) amended, p. 795, § 22, effective July 1.

L. 91:
(1) amended, p. 254, § 14, effective July 1.

L. 95:
(1) amended, p. 1398, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2005:
(6) added, p. 379, § 6, effective January 1, 2006.

L. 2006:
(6)(b) amended, p. 516, § 3, effective August 7.

19-6-101.5. Amendments of proceedings - adding children.

In any existing case commenced under this article, if it is alleged that another child has been conceived of the parents named in the existing case, that child shall be added to the existing case if at least one of the presumptions of paternity specified
in section 19-4-105 applies for the purpose of establishing paternity and child support. The caption shall be amended to include the added child.

The party amending the petition pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall serve the amended petition with the new caption upon the other parties in the manner set forth in section 19-6-103 (2).

Once the court has acquired jurisdiction over the proceedings, such jurisdiction shall be retained regardless of the added child's physical presence or place of residence.

An amended petition filed pursuant to this article shall comply with the requirements set forth in section 19-6-101.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, in any case where there exists more than one alleged or presumed father for a child pursuant to section 19-4-105, a new case shall be commenced for that child to determine the child's paternity,
establish child support, and address any other related issues. If it is determined that the child is the child of parents named in an existing case, the cases shall be consolidated into the initial action pursuant to rule 42 of
the Colorado rules of civil procedure.

Source:

L. 2008:
Entire section added, p. 1349, § 5, effective January 1, 2009.

19-6-102. Venue.

A petition filed under this section shall be brought in the county in which the child resides or is physically present, or in any county where the obligor parent resides, or in any county where public assistance is or was being paid on behalf of the child.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 811, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 89:
Entire section amended, p. 795, § 23, effective July 1.

L. 91:
Entire section amended, p. 255, § 15, effective July 1.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in 19-1-105 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

19-6-103. Summons.

Upon filing of the petition, the clerk of the court or the attorney for the petitioner or the delegate child support enforcement unit shall issue a summons stating the substance of the petition and requiring the respondent to appear at the time and place
set for hearing on the petition.

Service of the summons shall be by personal service as provided in the Colorado rules of civil procedure. In addition to any other method provided by rule or statute, including rule 4(e) of the Colorado rules of civil procedure, when there is a basis
for personal jurisdiction over an individual living outside this state pursuant to section 14-5-201, C.R.S., service may be accomplished by delivering a copy of the summons, together with a copy of the petition upon which it was
issued, to the individual served. Such service may be by private process server or by sending such copies to such individual by certified mail with proof of actual receipt by such individual.

The hearing shall be set for a day not less than ten days after service is completed or on such later date as the court may order.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 812, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 89:
(1) amended, p. 795, § 24, effective July 1.

L. 93:
(2) amended, p. 1564, § 15, effective September 1.

L. 96:
(1) amended, p. 613, § 16, effective July 1.

L. 2005:
(2) amended, p. 379, § 7, effective April 22.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in 19-7-102 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

19-6-104. Hearing - orders.

If the court or delegate child support enforcement unit finds that the respondent has an obligation to support the child or children mentioned in the petition or notice, the court or delegate child support enforcement unit may enter an order directing
the respondent to pay such sums for support as may be reasonable under the circumstances, taking into consideration the factors found in section 19-4-116 (6). The court or delegate child support enforcement unit may also enter
an order directing the appropriate party to pay for support of the child, in an amount as may be determined by the court or delegate child support enforcement unit to be reasonable under the circumstances, for a time period which
occurred prior to the entry of the support order established under this article.

(1.5) At the hearing, the court shall give a verbal advisement to the parties that a request for genetic tests shall not prejudice the requesting party in matters concerning allocation of parental responsibilities pursuant to section 14-10-124 (1.5),
C.R.S. The judge or magistrate shall further advise the parties that, if genetic tests are not obtained prior to the legal establishment of paternity and submitted into evidence prior to the entry of the final order establishing
paternity, the genetic tests may not be allowed into evidence at a later date.

If, at or before the hearing, the respondent waives his right to a hearing and stipulates to the entry of a support order, such stipulation may be presented to the court. If the court finds that the amount stipulated is reasonable under the circumstances,
it may enter an order of support in accordance with the stipulation.

The court may enter a temporary support order to remain effective pending a final disposition of the proceeding.

(3.5) Upon the filing of a proceeding under this article or upon the filing of a proceeding originating under article 13.5 of title 26, C.R.S., the court may enter an order allocating parental responsibilities pursuant to section 14-10-124 (1.5), C.R.S.,
except that, in matters involving a nonresident party, the court shall first determine whether it has authority to issue an order allocating parental responsibilities pursuant to article 13 of title 14, C.R.S. Nothing in this
subsection (3.5) shall be construed to authorize a delegate child support enforcement unit to negotiate or mediate the allocation of parental responsibilities in any proceeding initiated under this article or article 13.5 of
title 26, C.R.S.

The court may modify an order of support only in accordance with the provisions of and the standard for modification in section 14-10-122, C.R.S.

The court may order that the respondent initiate the inclusion of the child or children under a medical insurance policy currently in effect for the benefit of the respondent, purchase medical insurance for the child or children, or, in some other manner,
provide for the current or future medical needs of the child or children. At the same time, the court may make a determination of whose responsibility it shall be to pay required medical insurance deductibles and copayments.

(5.5) All child support orders entered pursuant to this article 6 must include the dates of birth of the parties and of the children who are the subjects of the order and the parties' residential and mailing addresses.

Any order made pursuant to this article shall not be exclusive.

The court may assess the costs of the action as part of its order.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 812, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 89:
(4) amended, p. 795, § 25, effective July 1.

L. 93:
(5.5) added, p. 1564, § 16, effective September 1.

L. 94:
(1) amended, p. 1542, § 17, effective May 31.

L. 97:
(5.5) amended, p. 1277, § 18, effective July 1.

L. 99:
(5.5) amended, p. 1087, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2005:
(3.5) added, p. 379, § 9, effective July 1; (1.5) added, p. 379, § 8, effective January 1, 2006.

L. 2019:
(5.5) amended, (HB 19-1215), ch. 270, p. 2553, § 4, effective July 1.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in 19-7-103 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

Cross references:
For the legislative declaration contained in the 1997 act amending subsection (5.5), see section 1 of chapter 236, Session Laws of Colorado 1997.

19-6-105. Failure to comply.

A person failing to comply with an order of the court entered under this article shall be found in contempt of court in accordance with section 14-14-110, C.R.S.

The court shall have authority to issue writs of execution for the collection of accrued and unpaid installments of support orders.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 812, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 89:
(1) amended, p. 796, § 26, effective July 1.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in 19-7-104 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

19-6-106. Child support - guidelines - schedule of basic support obligations.

The provisions of section 14-10-115, C.R.S., shall apply to all child support obligations, established or modified, as a part of any proceeding under this article, whether filed on or subsequent to July 1, 1988.

Source:

L. 88:
Entire section added, p. 746, § 17, effective July 1.